Hawaii statutes.
§571-92 Application. This part shall
only apply to actions under chapters 580 and 584. Nothing in this part shall
supersede any provision of any existing state or federal law. The provisions
in this part shall be interpreted consistently with other relevant laws and the
standard of "best interest of the child" shall remain paramount. [L
2010, c 177, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next